src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
!! # Numeral inflection
!! Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
!! forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.
! FIXME: compounding

LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Acc:    # ;



LEXICON dateyearcase ! todo: front/back for different 2:ssa, 5:ssa
+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
+Sg+Nom:%. # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff ! todo: Fix vowel harmony
+Sg+All:%>lle # ;


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
DIGITCASE0 ;
DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON DIGITCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
      +Sg+Nom:     #      ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+All:%>lle            # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD
+Arab+Sg+Gen:%>n # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR
+Arab+Sg+Gen:%>n # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL ! here we should remove this path, no coll in fin.
# ;

LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS
+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:- INENCount ;

LEXICON INENCount ! 33-vuotiset
vuotinen+N:vuoti NOUN_AAKKOSTAMINEN ;

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +Rom+Sg+All:%>lle  # ; !








!! # Original file

! nominatives
LEXICON NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative back
!!€ kaksi: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom # two
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative front
!!€ yksi: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom # one
+Sg+Nom:0   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural back
!!€ kahdet: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral nominative plural front
!!€ yhdet: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Nom
+Pl+Nom:%>t     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

! basic cases
LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular back
!!€ kahden: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Gen
!!€ kahdella: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ade
!!€ kahdelta: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abl
!!€ kahdelle: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+All
!!€ kahdessa: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€ kahdesta: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ela
!!€ kahdeksi: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra
!!€ kahdetta: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ade:%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak singular front
!!€ yhden: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Gen
!!€ yhdellä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ade
!!€ yhdeltä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abl
!!€ yhdelle: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+All
!!€ yhdessä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€ yhdestä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ela
!!€ yhdeksi: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra
!!€ yhdettä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abe
0    NUM_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
+Sg+Gen:%>n     NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT   ;
+Sg+Abe:%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Abl:%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ade:%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+All:%>lle   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ela:%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Ine:%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Tra:%>kse   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Sg+Tra:%>ksi   NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular back
!!€ kahtena: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
+Sg+Ess:%>na NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_BACK_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral strong singular front
!!€ yhtenä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
+Sg+Ess:%>nä NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Sg+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Sg+Gen:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
+Pl+Nom:0  NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back
!!€ kaksilla: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ade
!!€ kaksilta: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abl
!!€ kaksille: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+All
!!€ kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€ kaksista: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ela
!!€ kaksiksi: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Tra
!!€ kaksitta: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front
!!€ yksillä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ade
!!€ yksiltä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abl
!!€ yksille: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+All
!!€ yksissä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€ yksistä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ela
!!€ yksiksi: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Tra
!!€ yksittä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abe
+Pl+Abe:%>i%>ttä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Abl:%>i%>ltä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ade:%>i%>llä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+All:%>i%>lle  NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ela:%>i%>stä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse  NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural back strong
!!€ kaksina: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€ kaksine: kaksi+Num+Card+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>nä   NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
+Com:%>i%>ne        NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral weak plural front strong
!!€ yksinä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€ yksine: yksi+Num+Card+Com
+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na   NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
+Com:%>i%>ne        NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;


! allomorphs
LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a
!!€ kahdeksaa: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Par # eight
+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive ä
!!€ neljää: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Par # four
+Sg+Par:%>ä      NUM_FRONT_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive a poss aan
!!€ kolmea: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par # three
+Sg+Par:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive ta
!!€ kuutta: kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Par # six
+Sg+Par:%>ta     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular partitive tä
!!€ viittä: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par # five
+Sg+Par:%>tä     NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative an
!!€ kahdeksaan: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>an     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>a      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en back
!!€ kolmeen: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>en     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>e      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative en front
!!€ viiteen: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>en     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>e      NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative in back
!!€ miljardiin: miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill # billion
+Sg+Ill:%>in     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>i      NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral singular illative än
!!€ neljään: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
+Sg+Ill:%>än     #         ;
+Sg+Ill:%>ä      NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ia
!!€ kaksia: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
+Pl+Par:%>i%>a    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive iä
!!€ neljiä: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Par
+Pl+Par:%>i%>ä    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural partitive ja
!!€ miljardeja: miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
+Pl+Par:%>j%>a     NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ien back
!!€ kaksien: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ien front
!!€ yksien: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e    NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive jen back
!!€ satojen: sata+Num+Card+Pl+Gen # hundred NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>j%>e     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten back
!!€ kuutten: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive ten front
!!€ viitten: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen:%>ten    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>te     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in back
!!€ yhdeksäin: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare:%>i%>n    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare:%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural genitive in front
!!€ neljäin: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare:%>i%>n    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; 
+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare:%>i     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive ihin bavk
!!€ miljardeihin: miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin   #    ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive iin back
!!€ kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive iin front
!!€ yksiin: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;


! possessives
LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back
!!€ kahteni: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
+PxSg1:%>ni  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive front
!!€ yhteni: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
+PxSg1:%>ni  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back aan
!!€ kolmeaan: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>an    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back eenback
!!€ kahdekseen: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>en    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back een front
!!€ neljäkseen: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>en    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back ään
!!€ viittään: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>än    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
